Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-6202
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions
Act is to establish guidelines for the regulation of health professions which are not licensed or
regulated and those licensed or regulated health professions which
seek to change their scope of practice. The Legislature believes that
all individuals should be permitted to provide
a health service, a health-related service, or an environmental service unless
there is an overwhelming need for the state to protect the public from harm.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 4.